District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1814.02

Persons engaging in a profession — Duration.

Repealed.

History

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 358, ch. 258, art. I, title XIV, § 2
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 80, ch. 154, § 16
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1243(b), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1814.2.
1973 Ed., § 47-1591a.